src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal !!= @CODE@ Male names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Mihkal # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Mihkal:                Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Mihkkalij:               Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Mihkkalis:               Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur !!= @CODE@ Male names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Vándar # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Vándar:                  Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Vánndarij:               Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Vánndaris:               Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable ending on consonant, with cg. Objects. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable ending on consonant, with cg. Organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Europarádeministarjuogos # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Europarádeministarjuogos:                Europarádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Europarádeministarjuohkusij:               Europarádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Europarádeministarjuohkusis:               Europarádeministarjuogos+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable ending on consonant, with cg.Placenames
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL-PLC ;

!!€gt-norm: Hardangerduottar # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Hardangerduottar:               Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Hardangerduoddara:               Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen
!!€ Hardangerduoddarij:               Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Hardangerduoddaris:               Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE-ORG ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ          ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON DUORTNUSUCASE ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 !       :Q1     NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG !Outcommented b/c not sure we want short essive for propers?
 +Sg+Nom:Q1		K          ; 
 +Sg+Nom:Q1     RHyph      ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a    K          ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a    RHyph      ;
 +Sg+Acc:X5av   K          ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij   K          ;
 +Sg+Ine:X5in   K          ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is   K          ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn  K          ;
    +Ess:X5in   K          ;
 +Pl+Nom:X5a    K          ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij   K          ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij   RHyph      ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5ijt  K          ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K          ;
 +Pl+Ine:X5ijn  K          ;
 +Pl+Ela:X5ijs  K          ;
 +Pl+Com:X5ij   K          ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSUCASE-ORG ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
        :Q1    NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG
 +Sg+Nom:      RHyph      ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a   K          ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a   RHyph      ;
 +Sg+Acc:X5av  K          ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij  K          ;
 +Sg+Ine:X5in  K          ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is  K          ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn K          ;
    +Ess:X5in  K          ;
! +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5ij RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;

LEXICON TIEMPEL-obj !!= @CODE@ Same as DUORTNUS, only without second syll vowel change. Odd syllanle case marking Lexicon presently only for two -tiempel-final words. Lule sami stems.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> TIEMPELDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Artemistiempel # Odd-syllable test 
!!€ Artemistiempel:                  Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Artemistiemmpelij:               Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Artemistiemmpelin:               Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine
!!€ Artemistiemmpelis:               Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON TIEMPELDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ TIEMPELUCASE ;
 
 LEXICON TIEMPELUCASE ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 !       :Q1     NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG ! outcommented since we dont want short essive
 +Sg+Nom:Q1   K          ;
 +Sg+Nom:Q1   RHyph      ;
 +Sg+Gen:a    K          ;
 +Sg+Gen:a    RHyph      ;
 +Sg+Acc:av   K          ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij   K          ;
 +Sg+Ine:in   K          ;
 +Sg+Ela:is   K          ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn  K          ;
    +Ess:in   K          ;
 +Pl+Nom:a    K          ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij   K          ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij   RHyph      ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt  K          ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K          ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn  K          ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs  K          ;
 +Pl+Com:ij   K          ;

!! Lexicon HEANDARAT is not in use in smj

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc !!= @CODE@  Not in use in smj-propernouns. Place names.
!                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                 HEANDARATDECL-PLC ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>aQ100@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK            ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-ani
! +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-sur
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARATDECL
! @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARATUCASE ;

!LEXICON HEANDARATDECL-PLC
! @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARATUCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ           ; ! XXX Sub?


!LEXICON HEANDARATUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
! +Sg+Nom:a       K     ;
! +Sg+Nom:a       RHyph ;
!    +Ess:an      K     ;
! +Sg+Ill:aj      K     ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1     K     ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1     RHyph ;
! +Sg+Acc:aQ1v    K     ;
! +Sg+Ine:aQ1n    K     ;
! +Sg+Ela:aQ1s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:aQ1     K     ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j    K     ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j    RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt   K     ;
! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda  K     ;
! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn   K     ;
! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js   K     ;
! +Pl+Com:aQ1j    K     ;
! +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K     ;
!
!LEXICON HEANDARATUCASE-ORG ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
! +Sg+Nom:a       K     ;
! +Sg+Nom:a       RHyph ;
!    +Ess:an      K     ;
! +Sg+Ill:aj      K     ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1     K     ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1     RHyph ;
! +Sg+Acc:aQ1v    K     ;
! +Sg+Ine:aQ1n    K     ;
! +Sg+Ela:aQ1s    K     ;
!! +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
!! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
!! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;
!! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
!! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
!! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
!! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
!! +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
! +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K     ;
 
!! Words in lexicon EATNAMAT are odd-syllable plurals. Lule sami stems and non-assimilated stems.

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc !!= @CODE@  Place names. Presently only for Vuolleednama
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: EATNAMATDECL-PLC ;
 
!!€gt-norm: Vuolleednama # Contrcted test
!!$ Vuolleednam:               Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Vuolleednama:              Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom
!!€ Vuolleednamijda:           Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill
!!€ Vuolleednamijs:            Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela 

LEXICON EATNAMAT-org !!= @CODE@  Organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: EATNAMATDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Vuorká-Dávvira # Contrcted test
!!$ Vuorká-Dávvir:               Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Vuorká-Dávvira:              Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom
!!€ Vuorká-Dávvirijda:           Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill
!!€ Vuorká-Dávvirijs:            Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ela

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMATCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ         ;

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMATCASE ;

LEXICON EATNAMATCASE
    +Ess:%>in   K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>a    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij   RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn  K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs  K     ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ij   K     ;



!! !!Contracted proper nouns
! =============

!! Words in lexicon DAVVISUOLLU are contracted propernouns ending on -åj/-oj. Lule sami stems
