src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Bájdár:Bájddár9 DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Duorbun DUORTNUS-plc ;
Duornos:Duornnos DUORTNUS-plc ;
Europarádeministarjuogos:Europa#ráde#ministar#juohkos DUORTNUS-org ;
Gadar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Girjes:Girjjes DUORTNUS-plc ;
Hardangerduottar:Hard^anger^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Luokta-Mávas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Luonos DUORTNUS-plc ;
Mihkal:Mihkkal DUORTNUS-mal ;
Njunjes:Njunnjes DUORTNUS-plc ;
Oarjjelij-Bájdár:Oarjjelij-Bájddár9 DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Suttes:Suddes DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Sálatduottar:Sálat^duoddar9 DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Sálltoduottar:Sállto^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ;
Sáltoduottar:Sálto^duoddar9 DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Viestirálas:Viestir^állas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Vuolleednama:Vuolle^ednam EATNAMAT-plc ;
Vuorká-Dávvira:Vuorká-Dávvir EATNAMAT-org ;
Doages:Doahkes DUORTNUS-plc ;         !village
Miehttse-Doages:Miehttse-Doahkes DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Nállogielas:Nállo^gielas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Váhtjerduottar:Váhtjer^duoddar9 DUORTNUS-plc ;
Badje-Gájnaj:Badje-Gájnnah9 DUORTNUS-plc ;
Báhkkosavoj:Báhkko^savvoh9 DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gájnaj:Gájnnah9 DUORTNUS-plc ;
Gármas:Gármmas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Hákkes:Hágges DUORTNUS-plc ;
Stájnas:Stájnnas DUORTNUS-plc ;
Sávges:Sávgges DUORTNUS-plc ;
Ákkal:Ággal DUORTNUS-plc ;
